Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF820.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2136YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 820 Section 1. Section 8A.321, subsection 8, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Disposition of real property under this 3 subsection may include leasing the property to a religious 4 organization for the construction of a building to be used 5 for religious purposes. If real property leased under 6 this paragraph has been purchased or acquired from moneys 7 appropriated by the general assembly, the lease payments shall 8 be deposited with the treasurer of state and credited to the 9 general fund of the state or other fund from which the moneys 10 were appropriated. There is appropriated from that same 11 fund, with the prior approval of the executive council and in 12 cooperation with the director, a sum equal to the amount of 13 moneys so deposited and credited to the state agency to which 14 the leased real property belongs. 15